Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.390

Obligations of corporations or associations federally authorized to insure or market real estate mortgages—Loans, etc., eligible for insurance.

A mutual savings bank may invest its funds:

(1) In capital stock, notes, bonds, debentures, participating certificates, and other obligations of any corporation or association which is or hereafter may be created pursuant to any law of the United States for the purpose of insuring or marketing real estate mortgages: PROVIDED, That the amount a mutual savings bank may invest in the capital stock of any one such corporation shall not exceed five percent of the funds of the mutual savings bank and the total amount it may invest in capital stock pursuant to this subsection (1) shall not exceed ten percent of the funds of the mutual savings bank.

(2) In such loans, advances of credit, participating certificates, and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit as are eligible for insurance by any corporation or association which is or hereafter may be created pursuant to any law of the United States for the purpose of insuring real estate mortgages. The bank may do all acts necessary or appropriate to obtain such insurance. No law of this state prescribing the nature, amount, or form of security, or prescribing or limiting the period for which loans or advances of credit may be made shall apply to loans, advances of credit, or purchases made pursuant to this subsection (2).

[ 1963 c 176 s 17.]